California statutes. Financial Code
(2) (A) In determining for purposes of the annual assessment on the total assets of industrial banks that are authorized to transact industrial banking business and that have one or more foreign (other state) branch offices or facilities, the assets of the foreign (other state) branch offices and facilities shall be excluded from total assets. However, the commissioner may order the assets of foreign (other state) branch offices and facilities to be included in total assets if and to the extent that it is necessary or advisable in the commissioner’s judgment to (i) meet the expenses of the department on account of foreign (other state) branch offices and facilities that are not
 otherwise provided for and (ii) provide a reasonable reserve for contingencies.

(B) If the commissioner finds that an industrial bank authorized to transact industrial banking business allocated any asset to a foreign (other state) branch office or facility for the purpose, in whole or in part, of reducing its annual assessment, the commissioner may, for purposes of calculating the annual assessment on the industrial bank, reallocate the asset to the industrial bank’s head office.

(d) The base assessment rate for each annual assessment shall be fixed by the commissioner but shall not exceed two dollars and twenty cents ($2.20) per one thousand dollars ($1,000) of total assets.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Industrial Bank Business [1540. - 1542.]

1540.

Each industrial bank shall be an insured bank at all times while it is engaged in the industrial banking business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1541.

Subject to any order or regulation of the commissioner, an industrial bank may accept deposits evidenced by a deposit account or by certificates, that are redeemable prior to their stated maturity, but may not accept demand deposits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1542.

In addition to other provisions of this division that are otherwise applicable to an industrial bank, the following provisions of this division apply to the industrial bank as if it were a California state commercial bank:

(a) Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1070).

(b) Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 1090).

(c) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 1100).

(d) Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 1280).

(e) Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1320).

(f) Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 1380).

(g) Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 1400).

(h) Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 1450).

(i) Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 1460).

(j) Chapter 16 (commencing with Section 1550).

(k) Chapter 17 (commencing with Section 1620).

(l) Chapter 18 (commencing with Section 1660).

(m) Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670).

(n) Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 500) of Division 1.

(o) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 550) of Division 1.

(p) Division 1.6 (commencing with Section 4800).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 16. Trust Companies [1550. - 1613.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1550. - 1557.]

1550.

No corporation shall engage in the trust business unless:

(a) Its articles comply with the requirements of subdivision (b), (d), or (e) of Section 1100; and

(b) It has received from the commissioner a certificate of authority pursuant to Section 1042 to engage in the trust business, or, if it is a bank, has received the authorization of the commissioner to
 engage in the trust business; and

(c) It has deposited with the State Treasurer money or securities in compliance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 1570) of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1551.

Any commercial bank or industrial bank, with the prior authorization of the commissioner, may engage in the trust business, if its articles comply with the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 1100. Any bank so authorized shall, in the conduct of its trust business, comply with and be governed by all of the provisions of this chapter, except the provisions of Section 1580. An application for such authorization shall be in such form and contain such information as the commissioner
 may require, and be accompanied by a fee of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1552.

No California state bank may engage in trust business at a place unless the place is its head office, an authorized branch office, or an authorized place of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1553.

The following persons are exempt from Section 1550:

(a) Any natural person serving as trustee of one or more trusts where at least one trustor is a family member of that trustee. For purposes of this section, “family member” means any lineal ancestor, lineal descendant, person having a common lineal ancestor of not more than four generations distant, spouse, father-in-law, mother-in-law, sister-in-law, brother-in-law,
 stepparent, or stepchild.

(b) Any member of the State Bar, as specified in Section 6002 of the Business and Professions Code, any certified public accountant, as defined in Section 5033 of the Business and Professions Code, and any professional corporation of one or more members of the State Bar or certified public accountants, where these professionals are acting as trustee of a trust established by them for their respective clients, provided that the member of the State Bar, certified public accountant, or professional corporation engages in no advertising for trust business in this state.

(c) Subject to all applicable limitations and restrictions in law for nonprofit corporations, any nonprofit corporation acting as trustee incidental to the purposes for which it was organized.

(d) Any person appointed as
 receiver, trustee, or other fiduciary by a court of competent jurisdiction acting pursuant to that authority.

(e) Any person licensed as a professional fiduciary pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1554.

In this section, “subject national banking association” means a national banking association that (a) maintains its main office or a branch office in this state, (b) is authorized to transact a trust business, and (c) has complied with the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1570) of this chapter and of all other laws of this state relating to the deposit of securities for the protection of court and private trusts. A subject national banking association may engage in and
 conduct a trust business and may be appointed by any court to act in any fiduciary capacity in which a trust company is authorized to act. All acts provided in this code to be performed by the commissioner, the State Treasurer, or other public officials for or in respect to the deposit of securities by trust companies, shall be performed for subject national banking associations equally with trust companies. Every subject national banking association shall be permitted to use the word “trust” in its corporate name and to advertise its authority to engage in and conduct a trust business and to advertise for and solicit trust business in this state, notwithstanding any contrary provision in this division or in any other law. The commissioner shall have access to reports of examination made by the Comptroller of the Currency insofar as they relate to the trust department of a subject national banking association. For purposes of Article 3 (commencing with Section 1570), the principal place of business of a
 national banking association that maintains its main office in another state of the United States and maintains a California branch office shall be deemed to be situated in the city where the California branch office is located or, if the national banking association maintains California branch offices in two or more cities, in the city with the largest population.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1555.

No foreign corporation, other than a national banking association or a foreign (other state) state bank that is authorized to conduct a trust business in this state, shall have or exercise the powers of a trust company nor directly or indirectly transact or conduct in this state a trust business as defined in Section 115. However, a foreign corporation that is authorized by its articles to exercise trust powers may act as trustee for the following purposes:

(a) To deliver bonds and receive payments therefor.

(b) To deliver permanent bonds in exchange for temporary bonds of the same issue.

(c) To deliver refunding bonds in exchange for those of a prior issue or issues.

(d) To register bonds or to exchange registered bonds for coupon bonds or coupon bonds for registered bonds.

(e) To pay interest on the bonds, and take up and cancel coupons representing the interest payment.

(f) To redeem and cancel bonds when called for redemption or to pay and cancel bonds when due.

(g) To certify registered bonds for the purpose of
 exchanging registered bonds for coupon bonds.

A foreign corporation that is authorized by its articles to exercise trust powers may be appointed and may accept appointment and act as trustee under any mortgage, deed of trust, or other instrument securing bonds or other obligations issued or to be issued by any railroad corporation that owns a railroad operating in the State of California and extending into another state.

A foreign corporation exercising in this state the powers conferred by this section shall not establish or maintain directly or indirectly any branch office or agency in this state unless it has complied with all of the applicable provisions of Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 1750) or of Chapter 19 (commencing with Section 1670).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1556.

Pursuant to the authority contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution, the restrictions upon rates of interest contained in Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution shall not apply to any obligations of, loans made or arranged by, or forbearances of, any of the following that is authorized to engage in the trust business, when acting in its fiduciary capacity:

(a) Any California state
 bank.

(b) Any national bank that maintains its main office or a branch office in this state.

(c) Any foreign (other state) state bank that maintains a branch office in this state.

This section creates and authorizes an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the Constitution.

This section does not exempt a bank authorized to transact a trust business or a subsidiary thereof from complying with all other laws and regulations governing the business in which the bank or subsidiary is engaged.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1557.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is important to inform taxpayers that they may make voluntary contributions to certain funds or programs, as provided on the state income tax return. The Legislature further finds and declares that many taxpayers remain unaware of the voluntary contribution check-offs on the state income tax return. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage all persons who prepare state income tax returns to inform their clients in writing,
 prior to the completion of any tax return, that they may make a contribution to any voluntary contribution check-off on the state income tax return if they so choose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Fiduciary Activities [1560. - 1562.]

1560.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this article, insofar as they are contained in the regulations regarding fiduciary activities of national banks (Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations) of the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency, conform, and be interpreted by anyone construing the provisions of this article to so conform, to those regulations, any rule or interpretation promulgated thereunder by the Office of
 the Comptroller of the Currency, and to any interpretation issued by an official or employee of the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency duly authorized to issue the interpretation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1561.

For purposes of Section 1562, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Bank” means any of the following:

(1) A commercial bank, industrial bank, or trust company incorporated under the laws of this state.

(2) A foreign (other state) bank that may establish a branch office in this
 state in accordance with Article 2 (commencing with Section 1680) of Chapter 19.

(b) “Fiduciary Regulations” means the regulations regarding fiduciary activities of national banks promulgated by the Office of the Comptroller of the Currency (Part 9 (commencing with Section 9.1) of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations), as amended from time to time.

(c) “Affiliate” has the meaning set forth in Section 150 of the Corporations Code.

(d) “Applicable law” means the law of the state, another state, or other jurisdiction governing a bank’s fiduciary relationships, any applicable federal laws governing those relationships, or any court order pertaining to those relationships.

(e) “Custodian under a uniform gifts to minors act” means a fiduciary
 relationship established pursuant to the California Uniform Transfers to Minors Act (Part 9 (commencing with 3900) of Division 4 of the Probate Code).

(f) “Fiduciary account” means an account administered by a bank acting in a fiduciary capacity.

(g) “Fiduciary capacity” means trustee, executor, administrator, registrar of stocks and bonds, transfer agent, guardian, assignee, receiver, or custodian under a uniform gifts to minors act; investment adviser, if the bank receives a fee for its investment advice; any capacity in which the bank possesses investment discretion on behalf of another; or any other similar capacity.

(h) “Fiduciary powers” means the powers granted a bank by virtue of its receipt of the authority to engage in trust business from the commissioner.

(i) “Guardian” means the guardian or conservator, by whatever name used by law, of the estate of a minor, an incompetent person, an absent person, or a person over whose estate a court has taken jurisdiction, other than under bankruptcy or insolvency laws.

(j) “Investment discretion” means, with respect to an account, the sole or shared authority, whether or not that authority is exercised, to determine what securities or other assets to purchase or sell on behalf of that account. A bank that delegates its authority over investments and a bank that receives delegated authority over investments shall both be deemed to have investment discretion.

(k) “Trust office” means an office of a bank, other than a main office, at which the bank engages in the trust business. A trust office that engages in core banking business, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1670, is
 considered a branch office of the bank.

(l) “Trust representative office” means a facility as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 1670.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1562.

(a) Sections 9.4 to 9.6, inclusive, Sections 9.8 to 9.15, inclusive, and Sections 9.18 to 9.101, inclusive, of the Fiduciary Regulations in all of their particular, including footnotes, are hereby referred to, incorporated by reference into this article, and adopted.

(b) All references to the term “national bank” or “national banks” used in the Fiduciary Regulations shall mean “bank” or “banks” for
 purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Deposits with State Treasurer [1570. - 1578.]

1570.

Every trust company shall deposit with the State Treasurer money or securities of the character described in Section 1572 as security for its court and private trusts as follows:

(a) If the trust company’s principal place of business is situated in a city the population of which does not exceed 100,000 persons, it shall deposit with the State Treasurer money or securities having a market value of at least fifty thousand
 dollars ($50,000) as security for the faithful performance and execution of all court trusts accepted by it, and money or securities having a market value of at least fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) as security for the faithful performance and execution of all private trusts accepted by it.

Whenever any such trust company receives trust funds or property, other than real property, from court trusts accepted by it to the amount of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), it shall forthwith give the commissioner written notice thereof, and within 30 days thereafter shall make an additional deposit with the State Treasurer of money or securities having a market value of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) as security for its court trusts, and money or securities having a market value of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) as additional security for its private trusts.

(b) If the trust company’s principal
 place of business is situated in a city the population of which exceeds 100,000 persons, it shall deposit with the State Treasurer money or securities having a market value of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) as security for the faithful performance and execution of all court trusts accepted by it, and money or securities having a market value of at least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) as security for the faithful performance and execution of all private trusts accepted by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1571.

Whenever any trust company receives trust funds or property, other than real property, from court trusts accepted by it to the amount of one million dollars ($1,000,000), it shall forthwith give the commissioner written notice thereof, and within 30 days thereafter shall make an additional deposit with the State Treasurer of money or securities having a market value of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). For each additional five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) of such trust funds
 thereafter received by any trust company from court trusts a similar notification in writing shall forthwith be given to the commissioner and a further deposit of money or securities having a market value of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) shall be made within 30 days thereafter by such trust company with the State Treasurer until money or securities having a market value of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) have been so deposited.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1572.

Security deposited with the Treasurer by trust companies pursuant to Section 1570 or 1571 shall consist of the following:

(a) Bonds or other interest-bearing notes or obligations of the United States or those for which the faith and credit of the United States are pledged for the payment of principal and interest.

(b) Bonds of the State of California or those
 for which the faith and credit of the State of California are pledged for the payment of principal and interest or in registered warrants of the State of California.

(c) Obligations and securities of the type described in subdivisions (a) to (g), inclusive, of Section 1510.

(d) Obligations and assets of the type described in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 1511.

(e) Loans secured by a first lien on real property and otherwise complying with the provisions of subdivision (a) of Section 1486.

(f) Obligations issued, assumed, or guaranteed by the International Bank for Reconstruction and Development, the Inter-American Development Bank, the Asian Development Bank, the International Finance Corporation, or the African Development
 Bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1573.

Such money or securities shall be approved by the commissioner and be deposited with the Treasurer upon the written order of the commissioner. Upon receiving any such deposit the Treasurer shall give his or her receipt therefor and thereafter subject to the provisions of this chapter shall hold such deposits for the sole benefit of the beneficiaries of the class of trust business for the security and protection of which the same were deposited. The state is responsible for the custody
 and safe return of any money or securities so deposited. The Treasurer shall deposit any such moneys under the provisions of Sections 16370 to 16375 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1574.

Securities deposited pursuant to this article may be exchanged from time to time, with the approval of the commissioner, for other like securities of equal market value. Upon written request to the commissioner, any trust company shall be entitled to withdraw from the Treasurer, from time to time, any amount of its securities so deposited in excess of the amount it is required to maintain on deposit in order to conform with the requirements of this article. Upon receiving a written
 request for such withdrawal or exchange, and satisfactory proof of the facts warranting the same, the commissioner shall forthwith deliver to the Treasurer a written order directing the withdrawal or exchange of such securities so as to conform with the provisions of this section. The Treasurer shall comply with such written order. So long as the trust company so depositing such securities shall continue solvent, it shall have the right and shall be permitted by the Treasurer to receive the interest and dividends on any securities deposited by it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1575.

Should any security deposited pursuant to this article so depreciate in value as to reduce the deposit below the amount required by this article, additional money or securities shall be deposited promptly in amount sufficient to meet such requirements. The commissioner may make an investigation of the value of any security deposited pursuant to this article, at the time such security is presented for deposit or at any time thereafter, whenever in his judgment such investigation is
 necessary. The commissioner may make such charge as may be reasonable and proper for such investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1576.

When any revaluation of securities is made by the commissioner pursuant to Section 1575, other than at the time such securities are presented for deposit, United States Government securities having a maturity date less than five years from the date of such revaluation shall be valued at not less than par.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1577.

The money and securities deposited pursuant to this article shall be subject to sale and the same or the proceeds thereof shall be subject to disposal by the State Treasurer only on the order of a court of competent jurisdiction and for the benefit respectively of the beneficiaries of that class of trust business for the security and protection of which the securities were deposited.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1578.

The commissioner may, pursuant to Section 329, levy a civil penalty against any trust company that fails to comply with this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Investments [1580. - 1586.]

1580.

A trust company may invest its contributed capital only in the securities and properties in which a commercial bank is permitted to invest its funds pursuant to Sections 800 to 819, inclusive, and in loans on real property which commercial banks are permitted to make pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 1480) of Chapter 14.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1581.

Trust funds received by any trust company in connection with its trust business, if invested, shall be invested as provided in Part 4 (commencing with Section 16000) of Division 9 of the Probate Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1582.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Fund” means any investment company registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940 (15 U.S.C. Sec. 80a-1 et seq.), as amended from time to time.

(2) “Trust” means any court trust or private trust.

(3) “Trust Law” means Division 9
 (commencing with Section 15000) of the Probate Code.

(b) Within the standards established by trust law, including, but not limited to, Division 9 (commencing with Section 15000) of the Probate Code, a trust company acting in any capacity under a trust may, in the exercise of its investment discretion unless the trust instrument provides expressly to the contrary, invest and reinvest in the securities of or other interests in any fund to which the trust company or its affiliate is providing services including, but not limited to, services as an investment adviser, sponsor, distributor, custodian, agent, registrar, administrator, servicer, or manager, and for which the trust company or its affiliate receives compensation.

(c) Before or within 30 days after the initial investment upon the exercise of discretionary powers authorized by subdivision (b), the trust company, acting in any
 capacity under a trust, shall furnish written notice of the exercise of the discretionary powers and a copy of the prospectus relating to the securities to all persons to whom the trust company is required to render statements of account pursuant to applicable provisions of the Trust Law or to whom the trust company regularly provides a statement of account unless specifically waived in writing.

(d) With respect to any trust so invested, the trust company shall disclose to all persons identified in subdivision (c), at least annually by prospectus, statement of account, or other written notice, a brief description of the fees or rates charged by the trust company and its affiliates for its services as investment adviser or investment manager to the fund.

(e) In connection with an investment or reinvestment authorized by subdivision (b), the portion of compensation a trust company
 receives from the trust reasonably attributable to investment advisory or investment management services to the trust shall be reduced (but not below zero) by an amount equal to compensation that is received by the trust company or its affiliates for providing investment advisory or investment management services to the fund for the portion of the trust invested in the fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1583.

Any trust company or bank authorized to engage in the trust business holding trust funds awaiting investment or distribution may deposit or leave on deposit such funds with any state or national bank. Such funds shall not, however, be deposited or left with the same corporation or association depositing or leaving on deposit such funds or with any corporation or association holding or owning a majority of the capital stock of the trust company or bank making or leaving such deposit,
 unless such corporation or association shall first pledge, as security for such deposit, securities eligible for investment by savings banks having a market value of not less than the funds so deposited. No security shall be required with respect to any part of such deposits which is insured under the provisions of any law of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1584.

Any trust company acting in any capacity under a court or private trust or when acting in such capacity with one or more persons as cofiduciary or cofiduciaries, unless the instrument creating such trust contains a provision to the contrary, may, with the consent of such cofiduciary or cofiduciaries cause any stock or other securities held in any such capacity to be registered in the name of a nominee or nominees of such trust company and any trust company when acting as depositary or
 custodian for the trustee of any other court or private trust, unless the instrument creating the trust contains a provision to the contrary, may, with the consent of the trustee of such other trust, cause any stock or other securities held by it in such capacity to be registered in the name of a nominee or nominees of such trust company. Any such trust company shall be liable for any loss occasioned by the acts of any nominee of such trust company with respect to such stock or other securities so registered. The records of such trust company shall at all times show the ownership of any such stock or other securities and of those held in bearer form. Such stock or other securities and those held in bearer form shall at all times be kept by such trust company separate and apart from its other assets and may be kept by such trust company:

(a) In a manner such that all certificates representing the stock or other securities from time to time
 constituting the assets of a particular estate, trust or other fiduciary account are held separate from those of all other estates, trusts or accounts; or

(b) In a manner such that, without certification as to ownership attached, certificates representing stock or other securities of the same class of the same issuer and from time to time constituting assets of particular estates, trusts or other fiduciary accounts are held in bulk, including, to the extent feasible, the merging of certificates of small denomination into one or more certificates of large denomination, provided that a trust company, when operating under the method of safekeeping security certificates described in this subdivision, shall be subject to such rules and regulations as, in the case of state chartered institutions, the commissioner and, in the case of national bank associations, the Comptroller of the Currency, may from time to time issue. Such trust company shall, on
 demand by any party to an accounting by such trust company as fiduciary or on demand by the attorney for such party, certify in writing the stock or other securities held by such trust company as such fiduciary for such party.

No domestic or foreign corporation or the registrar or transfer agent of any such corporation shall be liable for registering or causing to be registered on the books of such corporation any share or shares or other securities in the name of any nominee of such trust company or for transferring or causing to be transferred on the books of any such corporation any share or shares or other securities theretofore registered by such corporation in the name of any nominee of such trust company as herein provided when the transfer is made upon the authorization of such nominee.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1585.

(a) For purposes of this section, two or more trust companies shall be deemed to be affiliated if they are members of the same affiliated group, within the meaning of Section 1504 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) Any trust company may establish and administer common trust funds composed of property permitted by law for the investment of trust funds, for the purpose of furnishing investments to any one
 or more of the following: (1) itself, as fiduciary; (2) itself and others, as cofiduciaries; (3) any affiliated trust company including, without limitation, any foreign (other state) affiliated trust company, as fiduciary; and (4) any affiliated trust company including, without limitation, any foreign (other state) affiliated trust company and others, as cofiduciaries. Any trust company may as such fiduciary or cofiduciary invest funds which it lawfully holds for investment in interests in common trust funds administered by itself or by any affiliated trust company including, without limitation, any foreign (other state) affiliated trust company, if such investment is not prohibited by the instrument, judgment, decree, order, or statute creating or governing such fiduciary relationship, and if, in the case of cofiduciaries, the trust company procures the consent of its cofiduciaries to such investment.

(c) Each common trust fund established hereunder shall be treated as an entity separate and distinct from the fiduciary relationships participating therein. No fiduciary in administering a participating fiduciary relationship shall be required to make any apportionment or allocation between the principal and income of this relationship different from that made for the common trust fund. No participating fiduciary relationship, nor any person having an interest in that relationship, shall have or be deemed to have any ownership in any particular property of the common trust fund, but each participating fiduciary relationship shall have a proportionate undivided interest in the fund and its income, and the ownership of all property of the common trust fund shall be in the trustee of the fund.

(d) This section shall apply to fiduciary relationships now in existence or hereafter
 established, whether the same be revocable or irrevocable. The commissioner, at his or her direction, may make an examination of any common trust fund established hereunder at the times and to the extent as he or she may deem advisable. The provisions of the Corporate Securities Law shall not apply to the creation, administration, or termination of common trust funds, nor to participation therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1586.

With regard to any participation certificates heretofore issued by any trust company, secured by a trust deed or mortgage, the full legal title in the deed or mortgage and debt (referred to in this section as “security”) shall be held by the trust company issuing the certificates as trustee of an express trust, with all powers necessary to extend, renew, enforce, collect, and liquidate the same, acquire title to the property covered thereby either through foreclosure or by voluntary
 conveyance; manage, lease, sell (either for cash or upon deferred payments), exchange, or otherwise realize upon the security or property and distribute the net proceeds thereof. All sums so realized shall, as and when received by such trustee, after payment of its compensation and all costs, charges, and expenses, including brokers’ commissions and advances for taxes and assessments, incurred or made in connection with the protection, administration, and liquidation of the security or property, be distributed to the trusts or persons who are beneficiaries of the trust, as their interests may appear therein. The rights and interests therein of any such beneficiary failing to contribute on demand its or his pro rata of sums advanced, expended, or required by the trust company in the protection, administration, or liquidation of the trust shall be subject to a lien for all sums, with legal interest thereon advanced, expended, or required for any of such purposes by the trustee or by any other beneficiary of
 the trust.

The trust in such security or property shall continue in the trust company so long as any of the certificates are outstanding, irrespective of any distribution of the certificates from the trust in which the same are held.

The purpose of this section is to define and clarify the rights and obligations of trust companies and of all persons and trusts interested in participation certificates issued under any authority of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Miscellaneous [1600. - 1613.]

1600.

A trust company has the following powers:

(a) It may act, or may be appointed by any court to act, in like manner as an individual, as executor, administrator, guardian or conservator of estates, assignee, receiver, depositary, trustee, custodian, or in any other fiduciary or representative capacity for any purpose permitted by law, may act as transfer agent or registrar of corporate stocks and bonds, may buy and sell
 securities for the account of customers, and may accept and execute any trust business permitted by any law of this or any other state or of the United States to be taken, accepted, or executed by an individual; and

(b) A trust company, upon becoming a member of the Federal Reserve System, shall continue to have such powers as may then or thereafter be conferred upon it by the laws of this state, subject to such federal rules, regulations, and laws as may govern state banks exercising trust powers or trust companies which become members of the Federal Reserve System.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1601.

For the purposes of this chapter, all trusts and other business permitted to be accepted or executed by a trust company are hereby classified and defined as either court trusts or private trusts.

A “court trust” is one in which a trust company acts under appointment, order, or decree of any court, as executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, assignee, receiver, depositary, or trustee, or in which it receives on deposit money or property
 from a public administrator, under any provision of this code, or from any executor, administrator, guardian, assignee, receiver, depositary, or trustee, under any order or decree of any court.
